Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.150

Local unified plan for the workforce development system—Strategic plan.

(1) Workforce development councils, in partnership with local elected officials, shall develop and maintain a local unified plan for the workforce development system including, but not limited to, the local plan required by P.L. 113-128 Sec. 108. The unified plan shall include a strategic plan that assesses local employment opportunities and skill needs, the present and future workforce, the current workforce development system, information on financial resources, diversity, goals, objectives, and strategies for the local workforce development system, and a systemwide financial strategy for implementing the plan. Local workforce development councils shall submit their strategic plans to the board for review and to the governor for approval.

(2) The strategic plan shall clearly articulate the connection between workforce and economic development efforts in the local area including the area industry clusters and the strategic clusters the community is targeting for growth. The plan shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) Data on current and projected employment opportunities in the local area;

(b) Identification of workforce investment needs of existing businesses and businesses considering location in the region, with special attention to industry clusters;

(c) Identification of educational, training, employment, and support service needs of job seekers and workers in the local area, including individuals with disabilities and other underrepresented talent sources;

(d) Analysis of the industry demand, potential labor force supply, and educational, employment, and workforce support available to businesses and job seekers in the region; and

(e) Collaboration with associate development organizations in regional planning efforts involving combined strategies around workforce development and economic development policies and programs. Combined planning efforts shall include, but not be limited to, assistance to industry clusters in the area.

(3) The board shall work with workforce development councils to develop implementation and funding strategies for purposes of this section.

[ 2017 c 39 s 5; 2009 c 151 s 8.]